Utah statutes.
58-40-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(1)  failing to supervise a therapeutic recreation technician, a student intern, or a temporarily licensed therapeutic recreation specialist when required to do so under this chapter or by rule;

(2)  failing to keep or maintain a recreational therapy treatment plan;

(3)  failing to safeguard a person's right to privacy as to the person's identity, condition, diagnosis, personal effects, or other matters about which the licensee is privileged to know from providing recreational therapy services;

(4)  failing to report to the division the unsafe, unethical, or illegal practice of a person who is providing recreational therapy services;

(5)  making sexual advances to a patient, requesting sexual intercourse or sexual favors from a patient, or engaging in other verbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature in the presence of a patient;

(6)  exploiting a patient or former patient for personal gain;

(7)  possessing or dispensing illegal or non-prescribed prescription drugs or medications;

(8)  using or being under the influence of alcohol or an illegal or non-prescribed prescription drug or medication while performing recreational therapy services; and

(9)  other actions as defined by division rule.



Enacted by Chapter 82, 2012 General Session

